North Carolina, session 2025, HB1001.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 2.(a) Article 9A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 90-171.38A. Sexual assault nurse examiners data collection.
On October 1 of each year, programs approved by the Board under G.S. 90-171.38 to train,
educate, and credential sexual assault nurse examiners shall annually report to the Board
information on all graduates from each program. This report shall include the number of total
graduates, the county of employment of each graduate, and, if known, where each graduate plans
to work or is employed."
SECTION 2.(b) The North Carolina Board of Nursing may adopt rules to implement
the provisions of this act.
SECTION 2.(c) This act becomes effective August 1, 2025.
*H1001-v-1*